Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-560
Birthing facility; newborn infant; hearing screening test; information provided.

(1) If a newborn infant fails a hearing screening test as provided in section 71-4742, the birthing facility performing such screening may provide to the parents of the newborn infant the following information:

(a) Potential birth defects caused by congenital cytomegalovirus;

(b) Testing opportunities for cytomegalovirus, including the opportunity to test for cytomegalovirus prior to the infant's discharge from the hospital or birthing facility; and

(c) Early intervention services.

(2) The informational material published under section 71-558, and such additional clarifying information as required by the parents, may be provided to the parents at the newborn infant's follow-up audiology appointment.

Laws 2022, LB741, § 36.